Maryland, session 2025, SB0053.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Natural Resources
4–803.
(a) The Department may adopt rules and regulations to effectuate the following
purposes:
(1) To restrict catching and possessing any blue crab;
(2) The methods by which crabs are taken;
(3) To close or open any specified area to catch crabs;
(4) To prohibit or restrict devices used to catch crabs;
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0053*

SENATE BILL 53
(5) To establish seasons to catch crabs;
(6) To establish that the workday for tidal fish licensees who catch crabs
using trotline gear may begin earlier than 1 hour before sunrise; and
(7) To establish minimum size limits for hard, soft, and peeler crabs.
[However, this section does not permit the Department to change existing license fees for
catching, picking, canning, packing, or shipping cooked hard or soft crabs or crab meat; or
for selling, or shipping live hard or soft crabs by barrel or crate. The Department may set
license fees on types of gear or equipment if not otherwise set by law.]
(b) (1) The Department may not adopt regulations to:
(i) Restrict a tidal fish licensee who catches crabs using trotline gear
to a workday of less than 8 hours per day, excluding time spent setting or taking up gear;
or
(ii) Establish time restrictions on a tidal fish licensee using trotline
gear for setting and taking up gear.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, if the Department
authorizes the workday to begin earlier than 1 hour before sunrise, then:
(i) The Department may not adopt regulations to restrict a tidal fish
licensee who catches crabs using trotline gear to a workday of less than 11 hours per day,
including time spent setting or taking up gear; and
(ii) Trotline gear may not be set earlier than the catch time
established by the Department.
(c) The Department shall adopt regulations that authorize a tidal fish licensee
who is authorized to catch crabs [using]:
(1) USING all legal gear to work 1 additional early hour on Labor Day,
Memorial Day, July 4, and the day before each of these holidays in a license year; AND
(2) TO BEGIN CATCHING CRABS AT LEAST 4 HOURS BEFORE SUNRISE
FROM JULY 1 THROUGH SEPTEMBER 30, INCLUSIVE.
(d) (1) THIS SECTION DOES NOT AUTHORIZE THE DEPARTMENT TO
CHANGE EXISTING LICENSE FEES FOR:
(I) CATCHING, PICKING, CANNING, PACKING, OR SHIPPING
COOKED HARD OR SOFT CRABS OR CRAB MEAT; OR

SENATE BILL 53 3
(II) SELLING OR SHIPPING LIVE HARD OR SOFT CRABS BY
BARREL OR CRATE.
(2) THE DEPARTMENT MAY SET LICENSE FEES ON TYPES OF GEAR OR
EQUIPMENT IF NOT OTHERWISE SET BY LAW.
(E) (1) The Department’s regulations may not become effective under this
section until the Department first holds public hearings.
(2) The Department shall advertise the time, place, and purpose of the
hearings in one newspaper of general daily circulation in the State, and at least in one
newspaper circulated in the affected region of each county whose waters may be directly
affected by the proposed regulations at least once per week for 2 successive weeks in
advance of the hearings.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2025.